Maryland, session 2025, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(a) In this section, “reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for
future major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a cooperative housing
corporation that:
(1) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the cooperative housing corporation to repair and replace;
(2) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful life of
each identified component;
(3) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified
component; and
(4) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish
any identified future repair or replacement.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the cooperative housing corporation shall have
an independent reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the first
meeting of the cooperative housing corporation at which the members other than the owner
have a majority of votes in the cooperative housing corporation.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, which shall be updated at least every 5 years thereafter.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.

HOUSE BILL 1133 3
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies to a cooperative housing corporation
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(G) IN ADDITION TO AN UPDATED RESERVE STUDY REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY REVISE A COMPLETED RESERVE STUDY
AT THE END OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR TO REFLECT ANY CHANGES MADE TO THE
COMMON ELEMENTS THAT YEAR.
Article – Real Property
11–109.4.

HOUSE BILL 1133
(a) In this section, “reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for
future major repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
(1) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common elements and any other components that are the responsibility
of the council of unit owners to repair and replace;
(2) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful life of
each identified component;
(3) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified
component; and
(4) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish
any identified future repair or replacement.
(b) This section applies only to a residential condominium.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.

HOUSE BILL 1133 5
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(F) IN ADDITION TO AN UPDATED RESERVE STUDY REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
CONDOMINIUM MAY REVISE A COMPLETED RESERVE STUDY AT THE END OF EACH
CALENDAR YEAR TO REFLECT ANY CHANGES MADE TO THE COMMON ELEMENTS
THAT YEAR.
11B–112.3.
(a) In this section, “reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for
future major repairs and replacement of the common areas of a homeowners association
that:
(1) Identifies each structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
component of the common areas and any other components that are the responsibility of
the homeowners association to repair and replace;
(2) States the estimated remaining useful life of each identified component;
(3) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each identified
component; and

HOUSE BILL 1133
(4) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to accomplish
any identified future repair or replacement.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a homeowners association:
(i) That has responsibility under its declaration for maintaining and
repairing common areas; and
(ii) For which the total initial purchase and installation costs for all
components identified in subsection (a)(1) of this section is at least $10,000.
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowners association that issues
bonds for the purpose of meeting capital expenditures.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a homeowners association established
in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the homeowners association shall have an
independent reserve study completed not more than 90 calendar days and not less than 30
calendar days before the meeting of the homeowners association required under §
11B–106.1(a) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.

HOUSE BILL 1133 7
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(F) IN ADDITION TO AN UPDATED RESERVE STUDY REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY REVISE A COMPLETED RESERVE STUDY AT THE
END OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR TO REFLECT ANY CHANGES MADE TO THE COMMON
ELEMENTS THAT YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.